District of Columbia statutes.
3-1204.07

Staff.

For each board, the Mayor may set the compensation of personnel he or she deems advisable, subject to available appropriations, in accordance with Chapter 6 of Title 1.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 407, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3304.7.